Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.462

Financial education public-private partnership—Jumpstart coalition national standards—Financial education learning standards—Technical assistance and grants for demonstration projects—Report.

(1) School districts are encouraged to voluntarily adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the financial education public-private partnership shall provide technical assistance and grants to support demonstration projects for district-wide adoption and implementation of the financial education learning standards under this section.

(3) School districts may apply on a competitive basis to participate as a demonstration project. The office and the partnership shall select up to four school districts as demonstration projects, with two districts located in eastern Washington and two districts located in western Washington, if possible.

(4) Selected districts must:

(a) Adopt the jumpstart coalition national standards in K-12 personal finance education as the essential academic learning requirements for financial education and provide students with an opportunity to master the standards;

(b) Make a commitment to integrate financial education into instruction at all grade levels and in all schools in the district;

(c) Establish local partnerships within the community to promote financial education in the schools; and

(d) Conduct pre and posttesting of students' financial literacy.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with the advice of the financial education public-private partnership, shall provide assistance to the demonstration projects regarding curriculum, professional development, and innovative instructional programs to implement the financial education standards.

(6) The selected districts must report findings and results of the demonstration project to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and appropriate committees of the legislature annually.

[ 2011 c 262 s 2; 2009 c 443 s 3.]